test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kiiras_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - kiirâs: # 2B
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Nom: kiirâs
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Gen: kiirrâs
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Acc: kiirrâs
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Ill: kirrâsân
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Loc: kirrâsist
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Com: kirrâsáin
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Abe: kiirrâsttáá
    kiirâs+N+Ess:    kirâsin
    kiirâs+N+Par:    kirâsid
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Nom: kirrâseh
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Gen: kirrâsij
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Acc: kirrâsijd
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Ill: kirrâsáid
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Loc: kirrâsijn
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Com: kirrâsijguin
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Abe: kirrâsijttáá
   
